West Virginia, session 2025, SB291.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. PHARMACISTS, PHARMACY TECHNICIANS, PHARMACY INTERNS AND PHARMACIES. §30-5-22. Pharmacies to be registered. (a) A pharmacy, an ambulatory health care facility, and a charitable clinic pharmacy shall register with the board.(b) A person desiring to operate, maintain, open, or establish a pharmacy shall register with the board.(c) To be eligible for a registration to operate, maintain, open, or establish a pharmacy the applicant shall:(1) Submit a written application to the board;(2) Pay all applicable fees;(3) Designate a pharmacist-in-charge; and(4) Successfully complete an inspection by the board.(d) A separate application shall be made and separate registration issued for each location.(e) Registration is not transferable.(f) Registration expires and shall be renewed biennially.(g) If a registration expires, the pharmacy shall be reinspected and an inspection fee is required.(h) A registrant shall employ a pharmacist-in-charge and operate in compliance with the legislative rules governing the practice of pharmacist care and the operation of a pharmacy.(i) The provisions of this section do not apply to the sale of nonprescription drugs which are not required to be dispensed pursuant to a practitioner’s prescription.(j) The provisions of this section do not apply to the sale or distribution of dialysate, drugs, or devices necessary to perform home peritoneal renal dialysis to patients with end state renal disease, provided the requirements of §30-5-29 of this code are met.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home